Washington statutes.
RCW 9.61.160

Threats to bomb or injure property—Penalty.

(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to threaten to bomb or otherwise injure any public or private school building, any place of worship or public assembly, any governmental property, or any other building, common carrier, or structure, or any place used for human occupancy; or to communicate or repeat any information concerning such a threatened bombing or injury, knowing such information to be false and with intent to alarm the person or persons to whom the information is communicated or repeated.

(2) It shall not be a defense to any prosecution under this section that the threatened bombing or injury was a hoax.

(3) A violation of this section is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 38; 1977 ex.s. c 231 s 1; 1959 c 141 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Explosives, endangering life or property: RCW 70.74.270, 70.74.280, 70.74.310.